District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

1-307.24

Rules.

Expired.

Sept. 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-155, § 5, 33 DCR 4809

History

1981 Ed., § 1-308.4.

Prior Codifications

Section 17 of D.C. Law 17-63 repealed this section as of the date when the District of Columbia Free Clinic Captive Insurance Company becomes operational.
Section 19(b) of D.C. Law 17-63 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Temporary Legislation

Expiration of Law 6-155

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-307.21.

Expiration of Law

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-155, “Free Clinic Assistance Program Act of 1986”, see Mayor’s Order 87-32, February 5, 1987.
Delegation of authority, see Mayor’s Order 88-100, April 26, 1988.

Delegation of Authority

Repeal of Part B: Section 16 of D.C. Law 17-196 provided: “The Free Clinic Assistance Program Act of 1986, effective September 23, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-155; D.C. Official Code § 1-307.21 et seq.), is repealed as of the date when the Agency becomes operational.”

Editor's Notes